Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-438
Infraction; treated as first offense; when.

Any person charged with commission of an infraction which was committed more than two years after such person's last conviction for the same infraction shall be charged as though the most recent infraction was a first offense.

Laws 1979, LB 534, § 5.